District of Columbia statutes.
22-3313

Destroying or defacing building material for streets.

It shall not be lawful for any person or persons to destroy, break, cut, disfigure, deface, burn, or otherwise injure any building materials, or materials intended for the improvement of any street, avenue, alley, foot pavement, roads, highways, or inclosure, whether public or private property, or remove the same (except in pursuance of law or by consent of the owner) from the place where the same may be collected for purposes of building or improvement as aforesaid; or to remove, cut, destroy, or injure any scaffolding, ladder, or other thing used in or about such building or improvement, under a penalty of not more than $25 for each and every such offense.

July 29, 1892, 27 Stat. 322, ch. 320, § 2
Conduct of prosecutions under this section, see § 22-1809.
1981 Ed., § 22-3113.
1973 Ed., § 22-3113.